Utah statutes.
57-1-42.   Liability of title insurer or title agent.

A title insurer or title agent purporting to act under the provisions of Section 57-1-40 who reconveys a trust deed or releases a mortgage is liable to the beneficiary or mortgagee for the damages suffered as a result of the reconveyance if:

(1)  the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been fully paid; and

(2) (a)  the title insurer or title agent failed to comply with the provisions of Sections 57-1-40 and 57-1-41; or

(b)  the title insurer or title agent acted with gross negligence or in bad faith in reconveying the trust deed.



Enacted by Chapter 185, 1995 General Session

